Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2575YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 731 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 136E.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 4 services. 5 2. âDirect supervisorâ means an individual who is physically 6 present during on-site mold remediation and is immediately 7 available to direct, instruct, and oversee the activities of 8 other individuals. 9 3. âMoldâ means any form of multicellular fungi often 10 found in water-damaged indoor environments and building 11 materials, and including cladosporium, penicillium, alternaria, 12 aspergillus, fusarium, trichoderma, memnoniella, mucor, and 13 stachybotrys chartarum. 14 4. âThird-party certificationâ means a mold remediation 15 certification offered by any of the following: 16 (1) The institute of inspection cleaning and restoration 17 certification. 18 (2) The national organization of remediators and microbial 19 inspectors. 20 (3) An organization, approved by the department of 21 inspections, appeals, and licensing by rule, that has standards 22 related to mold remediation similar to the entities in 23 subparagraphs (1) and (2). 24 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 136E.2 Mold remediation. 25 1. A person shall not perform mold remediation unless 26 the personâs process for mold remediation complies with the 27 ANSI/IICRC S520 standard for professional mold remediation, 28 or a similar standard as identified by the department of 29 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 30 2. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 31 shall establish a registry for entities that provide mold 32 remediation services. An entity applying to register in the 33 registry shall be required to provide proof that a direct 34 supervisor employed by the entity holds a current third-party 35 -1- LSB 2575YH (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 731 certification. 1 3. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 2 shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this 3 section, including but not limited to rules that allow the 4 department to access the registry established in subsection 5 2 for the purpose of performing the departmentâs duties in 6 section 136E.3. 7 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 136E.3 Mold ââ public awareness 8 campaign. 9 1. The department shall, in consultation with appropriate 10 agencies and organizations, establish a mold public awareness 11 campaign to assist the public in understanding the threat of 12 mold in indoor environments, and the importance of removing 13 mold. As part of the program, the department shall do all of 14 the following: 15 a. Disseminate information to the public via brochures 16 and the departmentâs internet site relating to the treatment 17 of mold in indoor environments and the importance of removing 18 mold. 19 b. Provide the public with contact information for 20 organizations or government agencies that can provide 21 information pertaining to the health effects of mold, mold 22 testing methods, or accredited industry standards for the 23 remediation of mold. 24 c. Once every five years, collaborate with the department 25 of inspections, appeals, and licensing to review technology 26 and treatment techniques for mold remediation that provide 27 additional protections for public health and safety. 28 2. On or before January 31 of each year, the department 29 shall submit a report to the general assembly concerning all 30 of the following: 31 a. New scientific evidence concerning health effects 32 associated with mold, or water damage, in indoor environments, 33 including the effects on air quality standards. 34 b. Changes in state and federal law that establish standards 35 -2- LSB 2575YH (3) 91 dg/ko 2/ 4 H.F. 731 for training, certifying, or licensing persons providing mold 1 remediation services in residential, public, or commercial 2 buildings. 3 3. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 4 to implement this section. 5